Georgia, session 2025_26, HB191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Title 19 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to domestic relations, is
amended in Chapter 13, relating to family violence, by revising subsection (e) of Code
Section 19-13-3, relating to petition seeking relief from family violence, temporary relief ex
parte, hearing, dismissal of petition upon failure to hold hearing, procedural advice for
victims, and delays, as follows:
"(e) If the court finds a party is avoiding service to delay a hearing, the court may delay
dismissal of the petition for an additional 30 days or may authorize service:
(1) By delivering the citation with a copy of the petition to the respondent in person or
by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested;
(2) Upon motion supported by affidavit, by leaving a true copy of the citation with a
copy of the petition attached with anyone over 16 years of age at the location specified
H. B. 191
- 1 -

LC 48 1403
in the affidavit that can be an employee of the respondent's place of employment or a
known relative; or
(3) By publication or any other manner that the affidavit or other evidence before the
court shows will be reasonably effective to give the defendant notice of the petition."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended in Chapter 13A, relating to dating violence protective orders,
by revising subsection (d) of Code Section 19-13A-3, relating to temporary relief to protect
from dating violence, hearing and evidentiary standard, non-attorney assistance, and delays,
as follows:
"(d) If the court finds a party is avoiding service to delay a hearing, the court may delay
dismissal of the petition for an additional 30 days or may authorize service:
(1) By delivering the citation with a copy of the petition to the respondent in person or
by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested;
(2) Upon motion supported by affidavit, by leaving a true copy of the citation with a
copy of the petition attached with anyone over 16 years of age at the location specified
in the affidavit that can be an employee of the respondent's place of employment or a
known relative; or
(3) By publication or any other manner that the affidavit or other evidence before the
court shows will be reasonably effective to give the defendant notice of the petition."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 191
- 2 -